Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.05.060

Recommendation to state legislature.

The voters of the state of Washington urge our current and future Washington state legislatures to ratify such an amendment when passed by congress and delivered to the states for ratification.

[ 2017 c 1 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 735, approved November 8, 2016).]